pt-BR: Tipo de areia: Areia para aquário; Areia artesanal colorida; Areia de construção; Areia do deserto; Areia de nivelamento; Areia para brincar; Areia polimérica; Areia para filtro de piscina; Areia grossa/hortícola; Areia de sílica; Areia vulcânica; Outro
de: Sandart: Aquariensand; Farbiger Dekosand; Bausand; Wüstensand; Nivellierungssand; Spielsand; Polymersand; Poolfiltersand; Scharfer/Gartensand; Quarzsand; Vulkansand; Sonstiges
fr: Type de sable: Sable d’aquarium; Sable décoratif coloré; Sable de construction; Sable du désert; Sable de nivellement; Sable de jeu; Sable polymère; Sable de filtre de piscine; Sable grossier/horticole; Sable de silice; Sable volcanique; Autre
ja: 砂の種類: 水槽の砂; クラフト用カラーサンド; 建設用の砂; 砂漠の砂; レベリングサンド; 砂遊び用サンド; ポリマーサンド; プールフィルター用サンド; シャープサンド/園芸用砂; 珪砂; 火山砂; その他
hu: Homok típusa: Akváriumi homok; Színes kézműves homok; Építési homok; Sivatagi homok; Kiegyenlítő homok; Játszóhomok; Polimer homok; Medenceszűrő homok; Szemcsés/kertészeti homok; Kvarchomok; Vulkanikus homok; Egyéb
zh-TW: 沙子類型: 水族箱沙; 彩色手工藝沙; 建築用沙; 沙漠沙; 鋪平沙; 遊戲沙; 聚合物沙; 泳池過濾沙; 細沙/園藝沙; 矽砂; 火山砂; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta peska: Akvarijski pesek; Craft pesek; Gradbeni pesek; Puščavski pesek; Izravnalni pesek; Pesek za igranje; Polimerni pesek; Pesek za filtriranje bazena; Oster/vrtnarski pesek; Kremenčev pesek; Vulkanski pesek; Druga
it: Tipo di sabbia: Sabbia per acquario; Sabbia colorata Craft; Sabbia da costruzione; Sabbia del deserto; Sabbia livellante; Sabbia da gioco; Sabbia polimerica; Sabbia per filtro piscina; Sabbia tagliente/orticola; Sabbia silicea; Sabbia vulcanica; Altro
vi: Loại cát: Cát bể cá; Cát màu thủ công; Cát xây dựng; Cát sa mạc; Cát san nền; Cát cho trẻ em chơi; Cát polyme; Cát lọc hồ bơi; Cát hạt sắc/cát làm vườn; Cát thạch anh; Cát núi lửa; Khác
fi: Hiekkatyyppi: Akvaariohiekka; Askarteluhiekka; Rakennushiekka; Aavikon hiekka; Tasoitushiekka; Hiekkalaatikkohiekka; Polymeerinen hiekka; Uima-altaan suodatinhiekka; Karkea puutarhahiekkka; Piidioksidihiekka; Vulkaaninen hiekka; Muu
sv: Sandtyp: Akvariesand; Färgad hobbysand; Byggsand; Ökensand; Utjämnande sand; Leksand; Polymersand; Poolfiltersand; Skarp/trädgårdssand; Kiselsand; Vulkanisk sand; Annat
cs: Typ písku: Akvarijní písek; Barevný řemeslný písek; Stavební písek; Pouštní písek; Vyrovnávací písek; Písek do pískoviště; Polymerní písek; Písek do bazénové filtrace; Ostrý/zahradnický písek; Křemičitý písek; Sopečný písek; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de areia: Areia de aquário; Areia colorida para trabalhos manuais; Areia de construção; Areia do deserto; Areia de nivelamento; Areia para brincar; Areia polimérica; Areia para filtro de piscina; Areia afiada/hortícola; Areia de sílica; Areia vulcânica; Outro
bg-BG: Вид пясък: Аквариумен пясък; Цветен декоративен пясък; Строителен пясък; Пустинен пясък; Изравняващ пясък; Игрален пясък; Полимерен пясък; Пясък за филтър на басейн; Остър/градински пясък; Силициев пясък; Вулканичен пясък; Друго
nl: Zandtype: Aquariumzand; Gekleurd knutselzand; Bouwzand; Woestijnzand; Egalisatiezand; Speelzand; Polymeerzand; Zwembadfilterzand; Scherp/tuinzand; Silicazand; Vulkanisch zand; Overig
lt-LT: Smėlio tipas: Akvariumo smėlis; Spalvotas dekoratyvinis smėlis; Statybinis smėlis; Dykumos smėlis; Lyginamasis smėlis; Žaidimų smėlis; Polimerinis smėlis; Baseino filtro smėlis; Aštrusis / sodininkystės smėlis; Kvarcinis smėlis; Vulkaninis smėlis; Kita
nb: Sandtype: Akvariesand; Farget hobby-sand; Byggesand; Ørkensand; Utjevningssand; Lekesand; Polymerisk sand; Bassengfiltersand; Skarp/hagebrukssand; Kiselsand; Vulkanisk sand; Annet
tr: Kum tipi: Akvaryum kumu; Renkli hobi kumu; İnşaat kumu; Çöl kumu; Tesviye kumu; Oyun kumu; Polimer kum; Havuz filtre kumu; Keskin/bahçe kumu; Silika kumu; Volkanik kum; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ piesku: Akváriový piesok; Farebný remeselný piesok; Stavebný piesok; Púštny piesok; Nivelačný piesok; Piesok na hranie; Polymérový piesok; Pieskový bazénový filter; Hrubý/záhradnícky piesok; Kremičitý piesok; Sopečný piesok; Iné
el: Τύπος άμμου: Άμμος ενυδρείου; Χρωματιστή άμμος χειροτεχνίας; Άμμος κατασκευών; Άμμος της ερήμου; Άμμος ισοπέδωσης; Παίξτε στην άμμο; Πολυμερική άμμος; Άμμος φίλτρου πισίνας; Κοφτερή/κηπευτική άμμος; Πυριτική άμμος; Ηφαιστειακή άμμος; Άλλο
th: ประเภทของทราย: ทรายสำหรับตู้ปลา; ทรายสีสำหรับงานประดิษฐ์; ทรายก่อสร้าง; ทรายทะเลทราย; ทรายปรับระดับ; ทรายสนามเด็กเล่น; ทรายโพลีเมอร์สำหรับยาแนวร่องพื้น; ทรายกรองสระว่ายน้ำ; ทรายหยาบสำหรับงานสวน; ทรายซิลิกา; ทรายภูเขาไฟ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип песка: Аквариумный песок; Цветной декоративный песок; Строительный песок; Пустынный песок; Выравнивающий песок; Песок для игр; Полимерный песок; Песок для фильтра бассейна; Острозернистый/садовый песок; Кварцевый песок; Вулканический песок; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta pijeska: Akvarijski pijesak; Obojeni ukrasni pijesak; Građevinski pijesak; Pustinjski pijesak; Pijesak za poravnavanje; Pijesak za igranje; Polimerni pijesak; Pijesak za filtriranje bazena; Oštar/hortikulturni pijesak; Silikatni pijesak; Vulkanski pijesak; Ostalo
ko: 모래 유형: 어항용 모래; 색모래; 건설용 모래; 사막 모래; 평탄화용 모래; 놀이용 모래; 고분자 모래; 수영장 여과사; 배양토용/세사; 규사; 화산 모래; 기타
es: Tipo de arena: Arena de acuario; Arena coloreada para manualidades; Arena de construcción; Arena del desierto; Arena niveladora; Jugar con arena; Arena polimérica; Arena para filtro de piscina; Arena afilada/hortícola; Arena de sílice; Arena volcánica; Otros
pl: Rodzaj piasku: Piasek akwariowy; Kolorowy piasek dekoracyjny; Piasek budowlany; Piasek pustynny; Piasek do poziomowania; Piasek do piaskownicy; Piasek polimerowy; Piasek do filtra basenowego; Piasek ostry / ogrodniczy; Piasek krzemionkowy; Piasek wulkaniczny; Inne
da: Sandtype: Akvariesand; Farvet håndværkssand; Byggesand; Ørkensand; Udjævningssand; Legesand; Polymerisk sand; Poolfiltersand; Skarpt/havebrugssand; Kiselsand; Vulkanisk sand; Andet
en: Sand type: Aquarium sand; Colored craft sand; Construction sand; Desert sand; Leveling sand; Play sand; Polymeric sand; Pool filter sand; Sharp/horticultural sand; Silica sand; Volcanic sand; Other
zh-CN: 沙子类型: 水族箱沙; 彩色工艺沙; 建筑用沙; 沙漠沙; 平整沙; 游戏沙; 聚合物砂; 泳池过滤沙; 粗砂/园艺沙; 硅砂; 火山砂; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de nisip: Nisip de acvariu; Nisip colorat pentru meșteșuguri; Nisip de construcție; Nisip de deșert; Nisip de nivelare; Nisip de joacă; Nisip polimeric; Nisip pentru filtru de piscină; Nisip ascuțit/horticol; Nisip de siliciu; Nisip vulcanic; Altele